src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-í3ssk_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - isska - ok : # -m animate noun, pail AEW NA1
     isska+NA+Sg: isska
     isska+NA+Pl: isskiksi
     isska+NA+Obv: isski
     isska+NA+Non: isski
     
     isska+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: [ noohka, noohkima ]
     isska+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: [ noohkiksi, noohkimiksi ]
     isska+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: [ noohki, noohkimi ]
     isska+NA+Px1Sg+Non: [ noohki, noohkimi ]
     
     isska+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: [ noohkinnaana, noohkiminnaana ]
     isska+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: [ noohkinnaaniksi, noohkiminnaaniksi ]
     isska+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: [ noohkinnaani, noohkiminnaani ]
     isska+NA+Px1Pl+Non: [ noohkinnaani, noohkiminnaani ]

     isska+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: [ koohkinnoona, koohkiminnoona ]
     isska+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: [ koohkinnooniksi, koohkiminnooniksi ]
     isska+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: [ koohkinnooni, koohkiminnooni ]
     isska+NA+Px21Pl+Non: [ koohkinnooni, koohkiminnooni ]

     isska+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: [ koohka, koohkima ]
     isska+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: [ koohkiksi, koohkimiksi ]
     isska+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: [ koohki, koohkimi ]
     isska+NA+Px2Sg+Non: [ koohki, koohkimi ]

     isska+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: [ koohkoaawa, koohkimoaawa ]
     isska+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: [ koohkoaawaiksi, koohkimoaawaiksi ]
     isska+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: [ koohkoaawayi, koohkimoaawayi ]
     isska+NA+Px2Pl+Non: [ koohkoaawai, koohkimoaawai ]

     isska+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: [ oohki, oohkimi ]
     isska+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: [ oohkiksi, oohkimiksi ]
     isska+NA+Px3Sg+Non: [ oohki, oohkimi ]

     isska+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: [ oohkoaawayi, oohkimoaawayi ]
     isska+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: [ oohkoaawaiksi, oohkimoaawaiksi ]
     isska+NA+Px3Pl+Non: [ oohkoaawai, oohkimoaawai ]
     
     PS/omahk+isska+NA+Sg: omahkohka
